src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv22_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: klógv
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: klógv
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: klógv
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: klóar
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: kløur
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: klóm
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: klógva
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: klógvin
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: klónna
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: klónni
    klógv+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: klóarinnar
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: klørnar
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [klónum, klørnum]
    klógv+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: klógvanna
